Utah statutes.
76-5-301.   Kidnapping.
(1) An actor commits kidnapping if the actor intentionally or knowingly,
without authority of law, and against the will of the victim:
(a)  detains or restrains the victim for any substantial period of time;
(b)  detains or restrains the victim in circumstances exposing the victim to
risk of bodily injury;
(c)  holds the victim in involuntary servitude;
(d)  detains or restrains a minor without the consent of the minor's parent or
legal guardian or the consent of a person acting in loco parentis, if the
minor is 14 years of age or older but younger than 18 years of age; or
(e)  moves the victim any substantial distance or across a state line.
(2)  As used in this section,  acting "against the will of the victim"
includes acting without the consent of the legal guardian or custodian of a
victim who is a mentally incompetent person.
(3)  Kidnapping is a second degree felony.
